yeoman-custom/cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/app/scripts/vendor/speak/dictsource/ta_rules
/***************************************************************************
 *   Copyright (C) 2009 to 2010 by Jonathan Duddington                     *
 *   email: jonsd@users.sourceforge.net                                    *
 *                                                                         *
 *   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify  *
 *   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by  *
 *   the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or     *
 *   (at your option) any later version.                                   *
 *                                                                         *
 *   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,       *
 *   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of        *
 *   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the         *
 *   GNU General Public License for more details.                          *
 *                                                                         *
 *   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License     *
 *   along with this program; if not, see:                                 *
 *               <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.                           *
 ***************************************************************************/

// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Tamil

// B means a combining vowel sign, or a virama
// K means a consonant or end-of-word
// phoneme [V#] means vowel [V], but NULL if the next phoneme is a vowel


.replace
௦	0	// Tamil numbers
௧	1
௨	2
௩	3
௪	4
௫	5
௬	6
௭	7
௮	8
௯	9

ொ	ொ
ோ	ோ
ௌ	ௌ

// க is k when preceded by these
.L01 ஷ்  ஸ்  ட்

// ப is p when preceded by these
.L02 ட்  ற்  ஷ்  ஸ்

// 'a' 'e' 'i'
.L03 இ  எ  அ

// alternative 's' characters
.L04 ச ஸ

// alternative 'r' characters
.L05 ர  ற

// H or g
.L06 க  ஹ

// aU or el.
.L07 ௌ ெள 


// words before "bottle"
.L10 பீர்  கலர் சாராய சோடா தண்ணி தண்ணீர் பிராந்தி வாட்டர் விஸ்கி  பிளாஸ்டிக் ப்ளாஸ்டிக் கண்ணாடி கிளாஸ் க்ளாஸ் மது 

// words after "booga"
.L11 வாழ்க்கை பூமி விருந்த மனிதன


// consonants

.group க
	க்ஷ 	ks.V
	க்ஷ (B	ks.

	க	gV   // inter-vocalic, unless there is virama before or after
	க (B	g
     _) க	kV
     _) க (B	k
     _) க (T	gV	// if word has $alt attribute in ta_list
     _) க (BT+	g	// $alt
	க் (க	k
     க்) க	kV#
     ற்) க	_kV
     ற்) க (B	_k
   L01) க	kV
   L01) க (B	k
	க (ிரு	k
	க (ூட	k
     ங்) க (ொ	k

	க (ீத		g
	க (ஜ		gV

//sort

     _) க (ங்கா		gV
     _) க (ங்காரு		kV
     _) க (ங்கை		gV
     _) க (டகட		gV
     _) க (டத்தில	gV
     _) க (டத்துக்க	gV
     _) க (டத்தை		gV
     _) க (டப்பாரை	gV
     _) க (டிகார 	gV
     _) க (டோத்கஜ	gV
     _) க (ணபதி	gV
     _) க (ணீர		gV
     _) க (ணே		gV
     _) க (ண்டங்		gV
     _) க (ண்டங்கத்த	kV
     _) க (ண்டத்த	gV
     _) க (தாயுத	gV
     _) க (திகலங்	gV
     _) க (திக்		gV
     _) க (திதா		gV
     _) க (திமோட்ச	gV
     _) க (திய		gV
     _) க (தியில் 	gV
     _) க (தியை		gV
     _) க (ந்தர்வ		gV
     _) க (னக்க		gV
     _) க (னத்		gV
     _) க (னம		gV
     _) கப் (L04ா	gVp
     _) கப்ச (ிப்		gVptS
     _) க (ப்பெ		gV
     _) க (ப்பென்ர	gV
     _) க (மகம		gV
     _) க (மவென்ற	gV
     _) க (ம்பீர		gV
     _) க (யாவ		gV
     _) க (ராஜ		gV
     _) க (ருட		gV
     _) க (ர்ஜ		gV
     _) க (ர்ப		gV
     _) க (ர்வ		gV
     _) க (லாட்டா	gV
     _) க (லீர		gV
     _) க (லீல		gV
     _) க (ளுக்		gV
     _) க (வண		gV
     _) க (வன		gV
     _) க (வர்னர		gV
     _) க (வர்ன்மெண்ட	gV
     _) க (வாஸ்கர	gV
     _) க (வுர		gV
     _) க (ாண்டாமிருக	g
     _) க (ாண்டீப	g
     _) காண்டேக (ர	ga:n.d.e:kV
     _) க (ாந்தங்		g
     _) க (ாந்தத்		g
     _) க (ாந்தி		g
     _) க (ானங்		g
     _) க (ானத்த		g
     _) க (ானம		g
     _) க (ானவித்தை	g
     _) க (ானா		g
	க (ாரன		k
	க (ாரர		k
     _) க (ிடுகிடு	g
     _) க (ின்னஸ	g
     _) க (ின்னென்ற	g
     _) கி (ரக		g
     _) கி (ரகண		g
     _) கி (ரந்த		g
     _) கி (ரவுண்ட	g
     _) கி (ரஹ		g
     _) கி (ராக்கி	g
     _) கி (ராதக		k
     _) கி (ராம		g
     _) கி (ரிகோரிய	g
     _) க (ிரிஜா		g
     _) க (ிரிதர		g
     _) கிரிஸ்டோப (ர	krist.o:fV
     _) கி (ரீட		k
     _) கி (ரீன		g
     _) கி (ரீன்லாந்த	g
     _) கி (ரீம		k
     _) க (ிரீஷ		g
     _) கி (ரீஸ		g
     _) க (ிருகஸ்தர	g
     _) க (ிருகிரு	g
     _) க (ிருஹஸ்தர	g
     _) கி (ரேக்க		g
     _) கி (ரேய		k
     _) கி (ரைண்டர	g
     _) கி (ரௌண்ட	g
     _) கி (ளப்_		k
     _) கிளப்ப (ில	kl.Vbb
     _) கிளப்ப (ுக்	kl.Vbb
     _) கிளப்ப (ை	kl.Vbb
     _) கி (ளாஸ		g
     _) கிளிட		kl.it.V#
     _) கி (ளினிக்	k
     _) கிளிப் (_	kl.ip
     _) கி (ளிப்பில	k
     _) கி (ளிப்பை	k
     _) கிளிப் (ல	kl.ip
     _) கி (ளியர	k
     _) கிளியோபாட் (ரா	klijo:pa:t
     _) கி (ளீன		k
     _) கி (ளேச		k
     _) கி (ளௌ	k
     _) க (ீதல		k
     _) க (ீத்த		k
     _) க (ுகநாத		g
     _) க (ுகன		g
     _) க (ுகராஜ		g
     _) க (ுகை		g
_மன்மதக்) க (ுகை		g
     _) க (ுஜராத		g
     _) க (ுஜால		g
     _) க (ுடியாத்த	g
     _) க (ுடுகுடு	g
     _) க (ுணங்		g
     _) குணச (ித்திர	gun.VtS
     _) க (ுணசீல	g
     _) க (ுணசேகர	g
     _) க (ுணச்		g
     _) க (ுணத்		g
     _) க (ுணநல	g
     _) க (ுணபர		g
     _) க (ுணப்பட	g
     _) க (ுணம		g
     _) க (ுணவதி	g
     _) க (ுணவான	g
     _) க (ுணா		g
     _) க (ுண்டடி	g
     _) க (ுண்டன	g
     _) க (ுண்டம்மா	g
     _) க (ுண்டர		g
     _) க (ுண்டாக	g
     _) குண்டாந்த (டி	gun.d.a:ntV
     _) க (ுண்டாய	g
     _) க (ுண்டு		g
     _) க (ுண்டை	g
     _) க (ுண்டோதர	g
     _) க (ுதிக்		g
     _) க (ுதிச்		g
     _) க (ுதித்		g
     _) க (ுதிப்		g
     _) க (ுபீர		g
     _) க (ுபுகுபு	g
     _) க (ுபுக்		g
     _) க (ுபேர		g
     _) குப் (த		gup
     _) க (ுப்பென்ற	g
     _) க (ுமாஸ்தா	g
     _) க (ுமுகுமு	g
     _) க (ும்பல		g
     _) க (ும்மிடிப்பூண்	g
     _) க (ும்மிருட்ட	g
     _) க (ும்மெ		g
     _) க (ுருகுல	g
     _) க (ுருக்கள	g
     _) க (ுருக்குல	g
     _) க (ுருசாமி	g
     _) க (ுருஜி		g
     _) க (ுருதேவ	g
     _) க (ுருநா		g
     _) க (ுருபூஜை	g
     _) க (ுருப்பெயர	g
     _) க (ுருமார	g
     _) க (ுருமூர்த்தி	g
     _) க (ுருரா		g
     _) க (ுருவா		g
     _) க (ுருவாய	g
     _) க (ுருவிட	g
     _) க (ுருவின	g
     _) க (ுருவு		g
     _) க (ுருவுடை	g
     _) க (ுருவை	g
     _) க (ுருவோட	g
     _) க (ுவஹாத்தி	g
     _) குவாலிட(ி	kwa:lit.
     _) குவ (ாலிபிகேஷன	kw
     _) கு (வாலியர	g
     _) க (ுஸ்தி		g
     _) க (ூகிள		g
     _) க (ூகுள		g
     _) க (ூடலூர	g
     _) கூர்க (ா		gu:rk
     _) க (ூர்க்கர		g
     _) க (ூர்க்கா		g
     _) க (ெஜ		g
     _) க (ெட்டி		g
     _) க (ெட்டிக்க_	k
     _) க (ெட்டிக்கனும	k
     _) க (ெட்டிக்கி	k
     _) க (ெட்டிரு	k
     _) க (ெத்		g
     _) கெள (தம		gaU
     _) கெள (ரவ		gaU
     _) கெள (ரி		gaU
     _) க (ெஸ்ட		g
     _) க (ேட்டண்டை	g
     _) க (ேட்டிலிருந்த	g
     _) க (ேட்டுக்குப்	g
     _) க (ேட்டைக்	g
     _) க (ேட்டைத்	g
     _) க (ேட்டைப்	g
     _) க (ேலி		g
     _) க (ொணத்	g
     _) க (ொணம	g
     _) க (ொரில	g
     _) கோக (ிலா	go:k
     _) க (ோகுல	g
     _) கோட்ச (ே	go:d.s
     _) க (ோதாவரி	g
     _) க (ோதுமை	g
     _) க (ோத்திரங்	g
     _) க (ோத்திரத்	g
     _) க (ோத்திரம	g
     _) க (ோத்ரா		g
     _) க (ோத்ரேஜ்	g
     _) க (ோந்து		g
     _) க (ோபப்		k
        கோப (ால	go:p
     _) கோப (ிகா+	go:p
     _) க (ோபிகை	g
     _) க (ோபிசெட்	g
     _) கோப (ித்து	ko:b
     _) க (ோபிநா	g
     _) க (ோபிய	g
     _) க (ோபுர		g
     _) க (ோமதி	g
     _) க (ோமாதா	g
     _) க (ோமிய	g
     _) க (ோயல		g
     _) க (ோர_		g
     _) க (ோர_மாட்ட	k
     _) க (ோர_முடிய	k
     _) க (ோர_வேண்ட	k
     _) க (ோரக		g
     _) க (ோரத		g
     _) க (ோரப		g
     _) க (ோரப்பட	k
     _) க (ோரம		g
     _) க (ோலிக	g
     _) க (ோலிய	g
     _) க (ோல்மால	g
     _) க (ோவா		g
     _) க (ோவிந்த	g
     _) க (ோஷ		g
     _) க (ௌ 		g
     _) கௌசிக		kaUsikV#
     _) கௌட (ில்ய	kaUt.
     _) க (ௌட்டில்ய	k
     _) க (ௌவ		k
     _) க் (ரவுண்ட	g
     _) க் (ரிகோரிய	g
     _) க்ரிஸ்டோப (ர	krist.o:fV
     _) க் (ரீன		g
     _) க் (ரூப		g
     _) க் (ரௌண்ட	g
     _) க்வ (A		kw
     _) க் (வாலியர	g
//endsort
